Connecticut, session 2026, SB00304.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Commissioner of Economic and
Community Development shall conduct a study of programs
administered by the Department of Economic and Community
Development. Such study shall include, but need not be limited to, (1)
information for the previous three-year period on participation in each
department program, (2) program quality controls in place, (3) program
expenditures in relation to program utilization, and (4) department
funding and expenditures by account. Not later than January 1, 2027,
the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, on the results of such
study to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
cognizance of matters relating to commerce.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
LCO No. 2228 1 of 2

Raised Bill No. 304
Section 1 from passage New section